Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Wood Destroying Insect Infestation Inspection Reports

62-21-201. Persons authorized to issue reports — Persons authorized to conduct inspections.

Wood destroying insect infestation inspection reports, as defined in this chapter, issued in conjunction with the sale or transfer of any real property shall only be issued by a chartered pest control operator licensed or employing personnel licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms. Only those persons licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms or certified in the category of industrial, institutional, structural and health related pest control working under the direct supervision of one licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms are authorized to conduct inspections for wood destroying insect infestation reports.

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 7.

62-21-202. Contents of report — Warranty — Civil liability.

A wood destroying insect infestation inspection report issued by a chartered pest control operator evidences the presence or absence of visible wood destroying insects and the presence or absence of visible damage caused by the insects noted on the day the inspection is made. Obstructions and inaccessible areas shall be so noted in the report.

The wood destroying insect infestation inspection report shall be submitted on forms prescribed by the National Pest Management Association and the department of housing and urban development. In addition to other information, the report shall include the address of the property, a graph or other diagram showing the layout of the property, the areas of damage or active infestation, if any, the name of the licensed or certified employee conducting the inspection, the pest control operator name, address and charter number, the date of the inspection and any recommendations for corrective action.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report is a warranty for ninety (90) days of the accuracy of any representations in the inspection report.

The person to whom a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report is issued may recover from the warrantor for breach of warranty compensatory damages, including all repair costs that are proximately related to the warranty as provided in § 62-21-203.

Any person knowingly issuing a false report or who issues a report without making a physical inspection of the site shall be liable in treble the amount of damages resulting from or incident to the breach of the warranty. The party injured by the breach may bring suit for the breach and for the damages.

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 8.

62-21-203. Remedies.

Disputes which cannot be resolved between property owners, lenders, and/or trustees and persons issuing a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report may be resolved in a court of appropriate jurisdiction. Prior to filing a suit for compensatory damages, the issuer of the report shall be given an opportunity to inspect the premises and to offer within thirty (30) days of such inspection a proposal for repair and treatment of the premises. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, if the property owner files suit prior to offering the issuer of the report an opportunity to inspect and propose repairs and treatments as required by this section, the issuer of the report shall have, in addition to the thirty (30) days in which to answer the complaint as provided in Tenn. R. Civ. P. 12, another thirty (30) days from the service of the summons and complaint within which to inspect and propose repairs and treatments before being required to answer the complaint. No property owner or lender shall be required to engage in an alternate dispute resolution process before filing a suit for compensatory damages.

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 9.

62-21-204. Effect of transfer of commercial pest control operation assets.

When the assets of a commercial pest control operation that issues wood destroying insect infestation inspection reports or performs other services relating to wood destroying organisms are sold or transferred or any servicing or financing rights are transferred, any contracts for wood destroying insect infestation inspections or other services that are a part of the assets or that are subject to such servicing or financing rights shall be enforceable against the persons or entities to which the assets, servicing or financing rights are transferred.

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 10.

62-21-205. Penalty.

Any person issuing a wood destroying insect infestation inspection report who does not hold a valid commercial pest control charter and who is not licensed in the category of wood destroying organisms is in violation of this chapter and commits a Class A misdemeanor punishable only by a fine of no more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 11.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-21-206. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner has the authority, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to promulgate all necessary rules and regulations concerning this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 668, § 12.

62-21-114. Termite service contracts.